Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1556.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-524, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-524. City lot claimed under recorded deed; five year limitation A. An action to recover a lot located in a city or town from a person having who has a recorded deed therefor for the lot, who claims ownership and has paid the taxes thereon on the lot, shall be brought within five years after the cause of action accrues, and not afterward, provided that the person against whom the action is brought, by himself or his grantors, has claimed ownership thereof of the lot and has paid the taxes thereon on the lot for at least five consecutive years next preceding the commencement of such the action.  Except as prescribed in subsection B of this section, a person who claims OWNERSHIP of the PROPERTY based on a recorded deed and who has paid the taxes on that property for at least five years is deemed the lawful owner of the property. B. This section does not apply to a person who is in possession of land and who in the absence of this section would claim title through a forged deed, and no person claiming under a forged deed or a deed executed under a forged power of attorney is allowed the benefits of this section. END_STATUTE